Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-536
Cities of the metropolitan class; mayor, city council; terms; city council districts; qualifications.

In a city of the metropolitan class, the mayor and seven city council members shall be elected for terms of four years at the general election pursuant to section 14-201. One city council member shall be nominated and elected from each of the districts into which the city is divided pursuant to section 14-201.03. The city council members shall meet the qualifications found in sections 14-204 and 14-230.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 132;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 34.